District of Columbia statutes.
36-305.02

Severability.

If any provision or part thereof of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is declared unconstitutional or invalid, such invalidity, unconstitutionality, or inapplicability shall not affect any other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end, all provisions of this chapter are hereby declared to be severable.

Apr. 19, 1977, D.C. Law 1-123, § 6-402, 24 DCR 2371
1973 Ed., § 10-242.
1981 Ed., § 10-242.